West Virginia, session 2026, SB217.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. county board of education. §18-5-13e. Community School Funding Formula Revision Act. The West Virginia Department of Education shall review the closures and consolidations of schools that are under consideration during the current year, and previous four fiscal years, and propose to the Legislature within 180 days such changes to the School Aid Formula as would be, or would have been, likely to prevent the closure of no fewer than 80 percent of those under current or previous consideration, regardless of any decisions rendered to date by school districts, when such justification for closure was predicated on financial and operational factors.